North Dakota, session 69, SB2386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 23-09.5-02 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. Transactions under this section may not:
a. Involve interstate commerce;
b. Be conducted over the internet or phone, through the mail, or by consignment;
c. Include the sale of uninspected products made from meat, except as provided under
subdivision db; or
d.b. Include the sale of uninspected products made from poultry, unless:
(1) The cottage food operator slaughters no more than one thousand poultry raised by
the cottage food operator during the calendar year;
(2) The cottage food operator does not buy or sell poultry products, except products
produced from poultry raised by the cottage food operator; and
(3) The poultry product is not adulterated or misbranded.; or
c. Include the sale of poultry products if the transaction involves interstate commerce.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2386 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2386 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 2 Absent 0
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 1 Absent 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State